Massachusetts, session 194th, H2611.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
During a pandemic or other state of emergency in which police departments are not
processing applications for gun license renewals, expiring or expired licenses which occurs or
occurred during the state of emergency will be valid until the renewal can be fully processed or
denied by the police department. This provision shall not prevent the Chief of Police’s authority
in taking a firearms license away should circumstances warrant as already appearing in the
MGL.
of 1